District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-417

Rules determining rights and duties of partners.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 639, Pub. L. 87-709, § 18
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-117.
1973 Ed., § 41-317.